Hawaii statutes.
§246-14 Eligibility. Any property of
not less than twenty- five acres in area is eligible for classification as
wasteland development property if it meets the classification requirements of
wasteland property as established by the director of taxation. No real
property under a lease having an unexpired term of less than thirty years shall
be eligible for classification as wasteland development property. [L 1965, c
255, §3; Supp, §128-9.32; HRS §246-14]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next